src/fst/orthography/Latn-to-Cyrl.xfscript
define bäComposeRule [ b ä ] -> [ б я ] ;
define baComposeRule [ b a ] -> [ б а ] ;
define biComposeRule [ b i ] -> [ б и ] ;
define byComposeRule [ b y ] -> [ б ы ] ;
define büComposeRule [ b ü ] -> [ б ю ] ;
define buComposeRule [ b u ] -> [ б у ] ;
define beComposeRule [ b e ] -> [ б е ] ;
define běComposeRule [ b ě ] -> [ б э ] ;
define böComposeRule [ b ö ] -> [ б ё ] ;
define boComposeRule [ b o ] -> [ б о ] ;

define väComposeRule [ v ä ] -> [ в я ] ;
define vaComposeRule [ v a ] -> [ в а ] ;
define viComposeRule [ v i ] -> [ в и ] ;
define vyComposeRule [ v y ] -> [ в ы ] ;
define vüComposeRule [ v ü ] -> [ в ю ] ;
define vuComposeRule [ v u ] -> [ в у ] ;
define veComposeRule [ v e ] -> [ в е ] ;
define věComposeRule [ v ě ] -> [ в э ] ;
define vöComposeRule [ v ö ] -> [ в ё ] ;
define voComposeRule [ v o ] -> [ в о ] ;

define gäComposeRule [ g ä ] -> [ г я ] ;
define gaComposeRule [ g a ] -> [ г а ] ;
define giComposeRule [ g i ] -> [ г и ] ;
define gyComposeRule [ g y ] -> [ г ы ] ;
define güComposeRule [ g ü ] -> [ г ю ] ;
define guComposeRule [ g u ] -> [ г у ] ;
define geComposeRule [ g e ] -> [ г е ] ;
define gěComposeRule [ g ě ] -> [ г э ] ;
define göComposeRule [ g ö ] -> [ г ё ] ;
define goComposeRule [ g o ] -> [ г о ] ;

define däComposeRule [ d ä ] -> [ д я ] ;
define daComposeRule [ d a ] -> [ д а ] ;
define diComposeRule [ d i ] -> [ д и ] ;
define dyComposeRule [ d y ] -> [ д ы ] ;
define düComposeRule [ d ü ] -> [ д ю ] ;
define duComposeRule [ d u ] -> [ д у ] ;
define deComposeRule [ d e ] -> [ д е ] ;
define děComposeRule [ d ě ] -> [ д э ] ;
define döComposeRule [ d ö ] -> [ д ё ] ;
define doComposeRule [ d o ] -> [ д о ] ;
define dʹComposeRule [ d́ ] -> [ д ь ] ;

define žäComposeRule [ ž ä ] -> [ ж я ] ;
define žaComposeRule [ ž a ] -> [ ж а ] ;
define žiComposeRule [ ž i ] -> [ ж и ] ;
define žyComposeRule [ ž y ] -> [ ж ы ] ;
define žüComposeRule [ ž ü ] -> [ ж ю ] ;
define žuComposeRule [ ž u ] -> [ ж у ] ;
define žeComposeRule [ ž e ] -> [ ж е ] ;
define žěComposeRule [ ž ě ] -> [ ж э ] ;
define žöComposeRule [ ž ö ] -> [ ж ё ] ;
define žoComposeRule [ ž o ] -> [ ж о ] ;

define zäComposeRule [ z ä ] -> [ з я ] ;
define zaComposeRule [ z a ] -> [ з а ] ;
define ziComposeRule [ z i ] -> [ з и ] ;
define zyComposeRule [ z y ] -> [ з ы ] ;
define züComposeRule [ z ü ] -> [ з ю ] ;
define zuComposeRule [ z u ] -> [ з у ] ;
define zeComposeRule [ z e ] -> [ з е ] ;
define zěComposeRule [ z ě ] -> [ з э ] ;
define zöComposeRule [ z ö ] -> [ з ё ] ;
define zoComposeRule [ z o ] -> [ з о ] ;
define źComposeRule [ ź ] -> [ з ь ] ;

define jäComposeRule [ j ä ] -> [ й я ] ;
define jaComposeRule [ j a ] -> [ й а ] ;
define jiComposeRule [ j i ] -> [ й и ] ;
define jyComposeRule [ j y ] -> [ й ы ] ;
define jüComposeRule [ j ü ] -> [ й ю ] ;
define juComposeRule [ j u ] -> [ й у ] ;
define jeComposeRule [ j e ] -> [ й е ] ;
define jěComposeRule [ j ě ] -> [ й э ] ;
define jöComposeRule [ j ö ] -> [ й ё ] ;
define joComposeRule [ j o ] -> [ й о ] ;

define käComposeRule [ k ä ] -> [ к я ] ;
define kaComposeRule [ k a ] -> [ к а ] ;
define kiComposeRule [ k i ] -> [ к и ] ;
define kyComposeRule [ k y ] -> [ к ы ] ;
define küComposeRule [ k ü ] -> [ к ю ] ;
define kuComposeRule [ k u ] -> [ к у ] ;
define keComposeRule [ k e ] -> [ к е ] ;
define kěComposeRule [ k ě ] -> [ к э ] ;
define köComposeRule [ k ö ] -> [ к ё ] ;
define koComposeRule [ k o ] -> [ к о ] ;

define läComposeRule [ l ä ] -> [ л я ] ;
define laComposeRule [ l a ] -> [ л а ] ;
define liComposeRule [ l i ] -> [ л и ] ;
define lyComposeRule [ l y ] -> [ л ы ] ;
define lüComposeRule [ l ü ] -> [ л ю ] ;
define luComposeRule [ l u ] -> [ л у ] ;
define leComposeRule [ l e ] -> [ л е ] ;
define lěComposeRule [ l ě ] -> [ л э ] ;
define löComposeRule [ l ö ] -> [ л ё ] ;
define loComposeRule [ l o ] -> [ л о ] ;
define ĺComposeRule [ ĺ ] -> [ л ь ] ;

define mäComposeRule [ m ä ] -> [ м я ] ;
define maComposeRule [ m a ] -> [ м а ] ;
define miComposeRule [ m i ] -> [ м и ] ;
define myComposeRule [ m y ] -> [ м ы ] ;
define müComposeRule [ m ü ] -> [ м ю ] ;
define muComposeRule [ m u ] -> [ м у ] ;
define meComposeRule [ m e ] -> [ м е ] ;
define měComposeRule [ m ě ] -> [ м э ] ;
define möComposeRule [ m ö ] -> [ м ё ] ;
define moComposeRule [ m o ] -> [ м о ] ;

define näComposeRule [ n ä ] -> [ н я ] ;
define naComposeRule [ n a ] -> [ н а ] ;
define niComposeRule [ n i ] -> [ н и ] ;
define nyComposeRule [ n y ] -> [ н ы ] ;
define nüComposeRule [ n ü ] -> [ н ю ] ;
define nuComposeRule [ n u ] -> [ н у ] ;
define neComposeRule [ n e ] -> [ н е ] ;
define něComposeRule [ n ě ] -> [ н э ] ;
define nöComposeRule [ n ö ] -> [ н ё ] ;
define noComposeRule [ n o ] -> [ н о ] ;
define ńComposeRule [ ń ] -> [ н ь ] ;

define päComposeRule [ p ä ] -> [ п я ] ;
define paComposeRule [ p a ] -> [ п а ] ;
define piComposeRule [ p i ] -> [ п и ] ;
define pyComposeRule [ p y ] -> [ п ы ] ;
define püComposeRule [ p ü ] -> [ п ю ] ;
define puComposeRule [ p u ] -> [ п у ] ;
define peComposeRule [ p e ] -> [ п е ] ;
define pěComposeRule [ p ě ] -> [ п э ] ;
define pöComposeRule [ p ö ] -> [ п ё ] ;
define poComposeRule [ p o ] -> [ п о ] ;

define räComposeRule [ r ä ] -> [ р я ] ;
define raComposeRule [ r a ] -> [ р а ] ;
define riComposeRule [ r i ] -> [ р и ] ;
define ryComposeRule [ r y ] -> [ р ы ] ;
define rüComposeRule [ r ü ] -> [ р ю ] ;
define ruComposeRule [ r u ] -> [ р у ] ;
define reComposeRule [ r e ] -> [ р е ] ;
define rěComposeRule [ r ě ] -> [ р э ] ;
define röComposeRule [ r ö ] -> [ р ё ] ;
define roComposeRule [ r o ] -> [ р о ] ;
define ŕComposeRule [ ŕ ] -> [ р ь ] ;

define säComposeRule [ s ä ] -> [ с я ] ;
define saComposeRule [ s a ] -> [ с а ] ;
define siComposeRule [ s i ] -> [ с и ] ;
define syComposeRule [ s y ] -> [ с ы ] ;
define süComposeRule [ s ü ] -> [ с ю ] ;
define suComposeRule [ s u ] -> [ с у ] ;
define seComposeRule [ s e ] -> [ с е ] ;
define sěComposeRule [ s ě ] -> [ с э ] ;
define söComposeRule [ s ö ] -> [ с ё ] ;
define soComposeRule [ s o ] -> [ с о ] ;
define śComposeRule [ ś ] -> [ с ь ] ;

define täComposeRule [ t ä ] -> [ т я ] ;
define taComposeRule [ t a ] -> [ т а ] ;
define tiComposeRule [ t i ] -> [ т и ] ;
define tyComposeRule [ t y ] -> [ т ы ] ;
define tüComposeRule [ t ü ] -> [ т ю ] ;
define tuComposeRule [ t u ] -> [ т у ] ;
define teComposeRule [ t e ] -> [ т е ] ;
define těComposeRule [ t ě ] -> [ т э ] ;
define töComposeRule [ t ö ] -> [ т ё ] ;
define toComposeRule [ t o ] -> [ т о ] ;
define tʹComposeRule [ t́ ] -> [ т ь ] ;

define fäComposeRule [ f ä ] -> [ ф я ] ;
define faComposeRule [ f a ] -> [ ф а ] ;
define fiComposeRule [ f i ] -> [ ф и ] ;
define fyComposeRule [ f y ] -> [ ф ы ] ;
define füComposeRule [ f ü ] -> [ ф ю ] ;
define fuComposeRule [ f u ] -> [ ф у ] ;
define feComposeRule [ f e ] -> [ ф е ] ;
define fěComposeRule [ f ě ] -> [ ф э ] ;
define föComposeRule [ f ö ] -> [ ф ё ] ;
define foComposeRule [ f o ] -> [ ф о ] ;

define xäComposeRule [ x ä ] -> [ х я ] ;
define xaComposeRule [ x a ] -> [ х а ] ;
define xiComposeRule [ x i ] -> [ х и ] ;
define xyComposeRule [ x y ] -> [ х ы ] ;
define xüComposeRule [ x ü ] -> [ х ю ] ;
define xuComposeRule [ x u ] -> [ х у ] ;
define xeComposeRule [ x e ] -> [ х е ] ;
define xěComposeRule [ x ě ] -> [ х э ] ;
define xöComposeRule [ x ö ] -> [ х ё ] ;
define xoComposeRule [ x o ] -> [ х о ] ;

define cäComposeRule [ c ä ] -> [ ц я ] ;
define caComposeRule [ c a ] -> [ ц а ] ;
define ciComposeRule [ c i ] -> [ ц и ] ;
define cyComposeRule [ c y ] -> [ ц ы ] ;
define cüComposeRule [ c ü ] -> [ ц ю ] ;
define cuComposeRule [ c u ] -> [ ц у ] ;
define ceComposeRule [ c e ] -> [ ц е ] ;
define cěComposeRule [ c ě ] -> [ ц э ] ;
define cöComposeRule [ c ö ] -> [ ц ё ] ;
define coComposeRule [ c o ] -> [ ц о ] ;
define ćComposeRule [ ć ] -> [ ц ь ] ;

define čäComposeRule [ č ä ] -> [ ч я ] ;
define čaComposeRule [ č a ] -> [ ч а ] ;
define čiComposeRule [ č i ] -> [ ч и ] ;
define čyComposeRule [ č y ] -> [ ч ы ] ;
define čüComposeRule [ č ü ] -> [ ч ю ] ;
define čuComposeRule [ č u ] -> [ ч у ] ;
define čeComposeRule [ č e ] -> [ ч е ] ;
define čěComposeRule [ č ě ] -> [ ч э ] ;
define čöComposeRule [ č ö ] -> [ ч ё ] ;
define čoComposeRule [ č o ] -> [ ч о ] ;

define šäComposeRule [ š ä ] -> [ ш я ] ;
define šaComposeRule [ š a ] -> [ ш а ] ;
define šiComposeRule [ š i ] -> [ ш и ] ;
define šyComposeRule [ š y ] -> [ ш ы ] ;
define šüComposeRule [ š ü ] -> [ ш ю ] ;
define šuComposeRule [ š u ] -> [ ш у ] ;
define šeComposeRule [ š e ] -> [ ш е ] ;
define šěComposeRule [ š ě ] -> [ ш э ] ;
define šöComposeRule [ š ö ] -> [ ш ё ] ;
define šoComposeRule [ š o ] -> [ ш о ] ;

define ŝäComposeRule [ ŝ ä ] -> [ щ я ] ;
define ŝaComposeRule [ ŝ a ] -> [ щ а ] ;
define ŝiComposeRule [ ŝ i ] -> [ щ и ] ;
define ŝyComposeRule [ ŝ y ] -> [ щ ы ] ;
define ŝüComposeRule [ ŝ ü ] -> [ щ ю ] ;
define ŝuComposeRule [ ŝ u ] -> [ щ у ] ;
define ŝeComposeRule [ ŝ e ] -> [ щ е ] ;
define ŝěComposeRule [ ŝ ě ] -> [ щ э ] ;
define ŝöComposeRule [ ŝ ö ] -> [ щ ё ] ;
define ŝoComposeRule [ ŝ o ] -> [ щ о ] ;

! Word-initial

define jaComposeRule [ .#. j a ] -> [ .#. я ] ;
define joComposeRule [ .#. j o ] -> [ .#. ё ] ;
define juComposeRule [ .#. j u ] -> [ .#. ю ] ;

! After vowel

define äjaComposeRule [ ä j a ] -> [ я я ] ;
define ajaComposeRule [ a j a ] -> [ а я ] ;
define öjaComposeRule [ ö j a ] -> [ ё я ] ;
define ojaComposeRule [ o j a ] -> [ о я ] ;
define üjaComposeRule [ ü j a ] -> [ ю я ] ;
define ujaComposeRule [ u j a ] -> [ у я ] ;
define ejaComposeRule [ e j a ] -> [ е я ] ;
define ějaComposeRule [ ě j a ] -> [ э я ] ;
define ijaComposeRule [ i j a ] -> [ и я ] ;
define yjaComposeRule [ y j a ] -> [ ы я ] ;

define äjoComposeRule [ ä j o ] -> [ я я ] ;
define ajoComposeRule [ a j o ] -> [ а я ] ;
define öjoComposeRule [ ö j o ] -> [ ё я ] ;
define ojoComposeRule [ o j o ] -> [ о я ] ;
define üjoComposeRule [ ü j o ] -> [ ю я ] ;
define ujoComposeRule [ u j o ] -> [ у я ] ;
define ejoComposeRule [ e j o ] -> [ е я ] ;
define ějoComposeRule [ ě j o ] -> [ э я ] ;
define ijoComposeRule [ i j o ] -> [ и я ] ;
define yjoComposeRule [ y j o ] -> [ ы я ] ;

define äjuComposeRule [ ä j u ] -> [ я я ] ;
define ajuComposeRule [ a j u ] -> [ а я ] ;
define öjuComposeRule [ ö j u ] -> [ ё я ] ;
define ojuComposeRule [ o j u ] -> [ о я ] ;
define üjuComposeRule [ ü j u ] -> [ ю я ] ;
define ujuComposeRule [ u j u ] -> [ у я ] ;
define ejuComposeRule [ e j u ] -> [ е я ] ;
define ějuComposeRule [ ě j u ] -> [ э я ] ;
define ijuComposeRule [ i j u ] -> [ и я ] ;
define yjuComposeRule [ y j u ] -> [ ы я ] ;

! single letters

define aRule [ a ] -> [ а ] ;
define bRule [ b ] -> [ б ] ;
define vRule [ v ] -> [ в ] ;
define gRule [ g ] -> [ г ] ;
define dRule [ d ] -> [ д ] ;
define eRule [ e ] -> [ е ] ;
define öRule [ ö ] -> [ ё ] ;
define žRule [ ž ] -> [ ж ] ;
define zRule [ z ] -> [ з ] ;
define iRule [ i ] -> [ и ] ;
define jRule [ j ] -> [ й ] ;
define kRule [ k ] -> [ к ] ;
define lRule [ l ] -> [ л ] ;
define mRule [ m ] -> [ м ] ;
define nRule [ n ] -> [ н ] ;
define oRule [ o ] -> [ о ] ;
define pRule [ p ] -> [ п ] ;
define rRule [ r ] -> [ р ] ;
define sRule [ s ] -> [ с ] ;
define tRule [ t ] -> [ т ] ;
define uRule [ u ] -> [ у ] ;
define fRule [ f ] -> [ ф ] ;
define xRule [ x ] -> [ х ] ;
define cRule [ c ] -> [ ц ] ;
define čRule [ č ] -> [ ч ] ;
define šRule [ š ] -> [ ш ] ;
define ŝRule [ ŝ ] -> [ щ ] ;
define ʺRule [ ʺ ] -> [ ъ ] ;
define yRule [ y ] -> [ ы ] ;
define ʹRule [ ʹ ] -> [ ь ] ;
define ěRule [ ě ] -> [ э ] ;
define üRule [ ü ] -> [ ю ] ;
define äRule [ ä ] -> [ я ] ;

! read
read regex [ BäComposeRule
.o. BaComposeRule
.o. BiComposeRule
.o. ByComposeRule
.o. BüComposeRule
.o. BuComposeRule
.o. BeComposeRule
.o. BěComposeRule
.o. BöComposeRule
.o. BoComposeRule
